Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.020

Department of retirement systems—Created—Director.

There is created a department of state government to be known as the department of retirement systems. The executive and administrative head of the department shall be the director, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed upon written notification by the governor to the respective retirement boards.

The director shall have complete charge of and supervisory powers over the department and shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of director while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that body the name of the person appointed to the position of director.

[ 2012 c 117 s 82; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 4.]